Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 36. Chesapeake Bay Commission.
§ 32.1-291.12. Search and notification.

The following persons shall make a reasonable search of an individual who the person reasonably believes is dead or whose death is imminent for a document of gift or other information identifying the individual as a donor or as an individual who made a refusal:

A law-enforcement officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other emergency rescuer finding the individual; and

If no other source of the information is immediately available, a hospital, as soon as practical after the individual's arrival at the hospital.

If a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift is located by the search required by subdivision A 1 and the individual or deceased individual to whom it relates is taken to a hospital, the person responsible for conducting the search shall send the document of gift or refusal to the hospital.

A person is not subject to criminal or civil liability for failing to discharge the duties imposed by this section but may be subject to administrative sanctions.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

§ 32.1-291.13. Delivery of document of gift not required; right to examine.

A document of gift need not be delivered during the donor's lifetime to be effective.

Upon or after an individual's death, a person in possession of a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift with respect to the individual shall allow examination and copying of the document of gift or refusal by a person authorized to make or object to the making of an anatomical gift with respect to the individual or by a person to which the gift could pass under §

32.1-291.11

.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

§ 32.1-291.14. Rights and duties of procurement organization and others.

When a hospital refers an individual who is dead or whose death is imminent to a procurement organization, the organization shall make a reasonable search of the records of the Virginia Department of Motor Vehicles and any donor registry that it knows exists for the geographical area in which the individual resides to ascertain whether the individual has made an anatomical gift.

A procurement organization shall be allowed reasonable access to information in the records of the Virginia Department of Motor Vehicles to ascertain whether an individual who is dead or whose death is imminent is a donor.

When a hospital refers an individual who is dead or whose death is imminent to a procurement organization, the organization may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to ensure the medical suitability of a part that is or could be the subject of an anatomical gift for transplantation, therapy, research, or education from a donor or a prospective donor. During the examination period, measures necessary to ensure the medical suitability of the part may not be withdrawn unless the hospital or procurement organization knows that the individual expressed a contrary intent.

Unless prohibited by law other than this Act, at any time after a donor's death, the person to which a part passes under §

32.1-291.11

may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to ensure the medical suitability of the body or part for its intended purpose.

Unless prohibited by law other than this Act, an examination under subsection C or D may include an examination of all medical and dental records of the donor or prospective donor.

Upon the death of a minor who was a donor or had signed a refusal, unless a procurement organization knows the minor is emancipated, the procurement organization shall conduct a reasonable search for the parents of the minor and provide the parents with an opportunity to revoke or amend the anatomical gift or revoke the refusal.

Upon referral by a hospital under subsection A, a procurement organization shall make a reasonable search for any person listed in §

32.1-291.9

having priority to make an anatomical gift on behalf of a prospective donor. If a procurement organization receives information that an anatomical gift to any other person was made, amended, or revoked, it shall promptly advise the other person of all relevant information.

Subject to subsection I of §

32.1-291.11

and §

32.1-291.23

, the rights of the person to which a part passes under §

32.1-291.11

are superior to the rights of all others with respect to the part. The person may accept or reject an anatomical gift in whole or in part. Subject to the terms of the document of gift and this Act, a person that accepts an anatomical gift of an entire body may allow embalming, burial or cremation, and use of remains in a funeral service. If the gift is of a part, the person to which the part passes under §

32.1-291.11

, upon the death of the donor and before embalming, burial, or cremation, shall cause the part to be removed without unnecessary mutilation.

Neither the physician who attends the decedent at death nor the physician who determines the time of the decedent's death may participate in the procedures for removing or transplanting a part from the decedent.

A donated part from the body of a donor may be removed only by a physician or technician. The physician or technician performing the removal shall be qualified to remove the donated part from the body. For the purposes of this section, "qualified" means:

If the part is an organ, a physician or technician who is authorized by the appropriate organ procurement organization;

If the part is an eye, a physician or technician who is approved by an eye bank as qualified to perform the act of eye recovery; or

If the part is tissue, any physician or technician who is approved by LifeNet as qualified to perform the act of tissue recovery.

An organ procurement organization may screen, test, and recover eyes and tissue on behalf of an eye bank or tissue bank. Any person authorized by this subsection to recover organs, tissues or eyes may draw blood from the donor and order such tests as may be appropriate to protect his health and the health of the recipients of the organs, tissues or eyes.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

§ 32.1-291.15. Coordination of procurement and use.

Each hospital in this state shall enter into agreements or affiliations with procurement organizations for coordination of procurement and use of anatomical gifts.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

§ 32.1-291.16. Sale or purchase of parts prohibited; penalty.

With the exception of hair, ova, blood, and other self-replicating body fluids, it shall be unlawful for any person to sell, to offer to sell, to buy, to offer to buy, or to procure through purchase any natural body part for any reason including, but not limited to, medical and scientific uses such as transplantation, implantation, infusion, or injection. Any person engaging in any of these prohibited activities shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the reimbursement of reasonable expenses associated with the removal, processing, preservation, quality control, storage, transportation, implantation, or disposal of a part.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

Cross references.

- As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see

§

18.2-10

.

§ 32.1-291.17. Falsification, etc. of document of gift; penalty.

A person that, in order to obtain a financial gain, intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces, or obliterates a document of gift, an amendment or revocation of a document of gift, or a refusal is guilty of a Class 4 felony.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

Cross references.

- As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see

§

18.2-10

.

§ 32.1-291.18. Immunity.

A person that acts in accordance with this Act or with the applicable anatomical gift law of another state, or attempts in good faith to do so, is not liable for the act in a civil action, criminal prosecution, or administrative proceeding.

Neither the person making an anatomical gift nor the donor's estate is liable for any injury or damage that results from the making or use of the gift.

In determining whether an anatomical gift has been made, amended, or revoked under this Act, a person may rely upon representations of an individual listed in subdivisions A 3, A 4, A 5, A 6, A 7, A 8, or A 9 of §

32.1-291.9

relating to the individual's relationship to the donor or prospective donor unless the person knows that the representation is untrue.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

§ 32.1-291.19. Law governing validity; choice of law as to execution of document of gift; presumption of validity.

A document of gift is valid if executed in accordance with:

This Act;

The laws of the state or country where it was executed; or

The laws of the state or country where the person making the anatomical gift was domiciled, has a place of residence, or was a national at the time the document of gift was executed.

If a document of gift is valid under this section, the law of this state governs the interpretation of the document of gift.

A person may presume that a document of gift or amendment of an anatomical gift is valid unless that person knows that it was not validly executed or was revoked.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

§ 32.1-291.20. Donor registry.

For the purposes of this Act, the donor registry is the Virginia Donor Registry established under §

32.1-292.2

.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

§ 32.1-291.21. Effect of anatomical gift on advance health-care directive.

In this section:

"Advance health-care directive"
means an advance directive executed by a prospective donor as provided in the Health Care Decisions Act (§

54.1-2981

et seq.).

"Declaration"
means a record signed by a prospective donor specifying the circumstances under which a life support system may be withheld or withdrawn from the prospective donor.

"Health care decision"
means any decision regarding the health care of the prospective donor.

If a prospective donor has a declaration or an advance health-care directive and the terms of the declaration or directive and the express or implied terms of a potential anatomical gift are in conflict with regard to the administration of measures necessary to ensure the medical suitability of a part for transplantation or therapy, the prospective donor's attending physician and the prospective donor shall confer to resolve the conflict. If the prospective donor is incapable of resolving the conflict, an agent acting under the prospective donor's declaration or directive, or, if there is no declaration or directive, or the agent is not reasonably available, another person authorized by law other than this Act, to make health care decisions on behalf of the prospective donor, shall act for the donor to resolve the conflict. The conflict shall be resolved as expeditiously as possible. Information relevant to the resolution of the conflict may be obtained from the appropriate procurement organization and any other person authorized to make an anatomical gift for the prospective donor under §

32.1-291.9

. Before resolution of the conflict, measures necessary to ensure the medical suitability of an organ for transplantation or therapy may not be withheld or withdrawn from the prospective donor if withholding or withdrawing the measures is not contraindicated by appropriate end-of-life care.

(2007, cc. 92, 907; 2008, c. 82.)

The 2008 amendments.

- The 2008 amendment by c. 82 added the paragraphs defining "Declaration" and "Health care decision" in subsection A, and rewrote subsection B.

§ 32.1-291.22. Cooperation between medical examiner and procurement organization.

A medical examiner and procurement organizations shall cooperate with each other to maximize the opportunity to recover anatomical gifts for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

If a medical examiner receives notice from a procurement organization that an anatomical gift might be available or was made with respect to a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner and a postmortem examination is going to be performed, unless the medical examiner denies recovery in accordance with §

32.1-291.23

, the medical examiner or designee shall conduct, when practicable, a postmortem examination of the body or the part in a manner and within a period compatible with its preservation for the purposes of the gift.

A part may not be removed from the body of a decedent under the jurisdiction of a medical examiner for transplantation, therapy, research, or education unless the part is the subject of an anatomical gift. The body of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner may not be delivered to a person for research or education unless the body is the subject of an anatomical gift. This subsection does not preclude a medical examiner from performing the medicolegal autopsy upon the body or parts of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner or from using the body or parts of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner for the purposes of education, training, and research required by the medical examiner.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

§ 32.1-291.23. Facilitation of anatomical gift from decedent whose body is under jurisdiction of medical examiner.

Upon request of a procurement organization, a medical examiner shall release to the procurement organization the name, contact information, and available medical and social history of a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner. If the decedent's body or part is medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research, or education, the medical examiner shall release postmortem examination results to the procurement organization. The procurement organization may make a subsequent disclosure of the postmortem examination results or other information received from the medical examiner only if relevant to transplantation, therapy, research or education.

The medical examiner may conduct a medicolegal investigation by reviewing all medical records, laboratory test results, x-rays, other diagnostic results, and other information that any person possesses about a donor or prospective donor whose body is under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner that the medical examiner determines may be relevant to the investigation.

A person that has any information requested by a medical examiner pursuant to subsection B shall provide that information as expeditiously as possible to allow the medical examiner to conduct the medicolegal investigation within a period compatible with the preservation of parts for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

If an anatomical gift has been or might be made of a part of a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner and a postmortem examination is not required, or the medical examiner determines that a postmortem examination is required but that the recovery of the part that is the subject of an anatomical gift will not interfere with the examination, the medical examiner and procurement organization shall cooperate in the timely removal of the part from the decedent for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

The medical examiner and procurement organizations shall enter into an agreement setting forth protocols and procedures to govern relations between the parties when an anatomical gift of a part from a decedent under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner has been or might be made, but the medical examiner believes that the recovery of the part could interfere with the postmortem investigation into the decedent's cause or manner of death. Decisions regarding the recovery of organs, tissue and eyes from such a decedent shall be made in accordance with the agreement. In the event that the medical examiner denies recovery of an anatomical gift, the procurement organization may request the Chief Medical Examiner to reconsider the denial and to permit the recovery to proceed. The parties shall evaluate the effectiveness of the protocols and procedures at regular intervals but no less frequently than every two years.

If the medical examiner or designee allows recovery of a part under subsection D or E, the procurement organization, upon request, shall cause the physician or technician who removes the part to provide the medical examiner with a record describing the condition of the part, a biopsy, a photograph, and any other information and observations that would assist in the postmortem examination.

If a medical examiner or designee is required to be present at a removal procedure under subsection E, upon request the procurement organization requesting the recovery of the part shall reimburse the medical examiner or designee for the additional costs incurred in complying with subsection E.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

§ 32.1-291.24. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)

§ 32.1-291.25. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This Act modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede § 101(a) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).

(2007, cc. 92, 907.)